it: Formato del prodotto bevanda: Capsule; Concentrato; Congelato; Bevanda istantanea; Pronto da bere; A lunga conservazione; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka s pijačo: Kapsule; Koncentrat; Zamrznjeno; Instant pijača; Pripravljeno za pitje; Dolgo shranjevanje na polici; Drugo
el: Μορφή προϊόντος ροφήματος: Κάψουλες; Συμπύκνωμα; Παγωμένο; Ποτό στιγμιαίας παρασκευής; Έτοιμο για κατανάλωση; Εκτός ψυγείου; Άλλο
lt-LT: Gėrimo pavidalas: Kapsulės; Koncentratas; Šaldytas; Tirpusis gėrimas; Paruoštas gerti; Ilgai negendantis; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на продукта за напитки: Капсули; Концентрат; Замразена; Незабавна напитка; Готова за пиене; Устойчива; Други
ro-RO: Forma produsului de băut: Capsule; Concentrat; Înghețat; Băutură instantanee; Gata preparat; Durată lungă de conservare; Altele
pl: Forma napoju: Kapsułki; Koncentrat; Mrożony; Napój instant; Gotowe do spożycia; O przedłużonej trwałości; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Ficha técnica da bebida: Cápsulas; Concentrado; Congelado; Bebida instantânea; Pronta para beber; Não precisa de refrigeração; Outro
vi: Mẫu sản phẩm đồ uống: Trà viên; Cô đặc; Đông lạnh; Đồ uống liền; Sẵn sàng để uống; Bảo quản lâu dài; Khác
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์เครื่องดื่ม: แคปซูล; แบบเข้มข้น; แช่แข็ง; เครื่องดื่มสำเร็จรูป; พร้อมดื่ม; เก็บรักษาไว้ได้นาน; อื่นๆ
ko: 음료 제품 형태: 캡슐; 농축; 냉동; 인스턴트 음료; 바로 마실 수 있음; 선반 보관 가능; 기타
pt-PT: Ficha do produto para bebidas: Cápsulas; Concentrado; Congelado; Bebida instantânea; Pronto para beber; Prateleira fixa; Outro
tr: İçecek ürünü formu: Kapsüller; Konsantre; Dondurulmuş; Anında içecek; İçmeye hazır; Rafa dayanıklı; Diğer
ru: Форма выпуска напитка: Капсулы; Концентрат; Замороженный; Растворимый напиток; Готов к употреблению; Длительного хранения; Другое
ja: 飲料商品の形態: カプセル; コンセントレート; 冷凍; インスタントドリンク; すぐに飲める; 保存可能; その他
es: Forma de producto de bebida: Cápsulas; Concentrado; Congelado; Bebida instantánea; Listo para beber; Estable en estantería; Otros
zh-TW: 飲料商品形式: 膠囊; 濃縮; 冷凍; 即溶飲料; 即飲; 可長期保存; 其他
de: Form des Getränkeprodukts: Kapseln; Konzentrat; Gefroren; Instantgetränk; Sofort trinkbar; Lange lagerfähig; Sonstiges
fr: Forme de la boisson: Capsules; Concentré; Congelé; Boisson instantanée; Prêt à boire; Longue conservation; Autre
hu: Italtermék formája: Kapszulák; Koncentrátum; Fagyasztott; Instant ital; Fogyasztásra alkalmas; Tartós; Egyéb
cs: Forma nápoje: Kapsle; Koncentrát; Mražené; Instantní nápoj; Připraveno k pití; Skladovatelné v regálech; Jiné
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda za piće: Kapsule; Koncentrat; Smrznuto; Instant piće; Spremno za piće; Dugi rok trajanja; Ostalo
nb: Form på drikkevareprodukt: Kapsler; Konsentrat; Frossen; Instant-drikke; Drikkeklar; Lang holdbarhet; Annen
en: Beverage product form: Capsules; Concentrate; Frozen; Instant drink; Ready-to-drink; Shelf-stable; Other
sv: Dryckesproduktform: Kapslar; Koncentrat; Fryst; Snabbdryck; Färdig att dricka; Lång hållbarhet; Annat
da: Drikkevareproduktform: Kapsler; Koncentrat; Frosset; Instant drik; Klar til at drikke; Hyldestabil; Andet
fi: Juomatuotemuoto: Kapselit; Tiiviste; Jäätynyt; Pikajuoma; Valmis käytettäväksi; Säilyke; Muu
sk-SK: Forma nápojového produktu: Kapsuly; Koncentrát; Zmrazený; Instantný nápoj; Pripravený na pitie; Stabilná polica; Iné
nl: Vorm drankproduct: Capsules; Concentraat; Bevroren; Instant drank; Drinkklaar; Houdbaar; Andere
zh-CN: 饮料产品形态: 胶囊; 浓缩液; 冷冻; 速溶饮料; 即饮型; 耐储藏; 其他